test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-hop_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - хоп: # Noun 'boat'
     хоп+N+Sg+Nom: хоп
     хоп+N+Sg+Lat: хопа
     хоп+N+Sg+Loc: хопӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: хопем
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: хопема
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: хопемӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: хопен
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: хопена
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: хопенӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: хоплд
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: хоплда
     хоп+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: хоплдӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: хопемӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Lat: хопемӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: хопемӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: хопӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: хопӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: хопев
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: хопева
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: хопевӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: хопӑн
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: хопӑна
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: хопӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: хопӑлд
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: хопӑлда
     хоп+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: хопӑлдӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+Nom: хопнгӑн
     хоп+N+Du+Lat: хопнгӑна
     хоп+N+Du+Loc: хопнгӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Nom: хопнгӑлдам
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Lat: хопнгӑлдама
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg1+Loc: хопнгӑлдамӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Nom: хопнгӑлдан
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Lat: хопнгӑлдана
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg2+Loc: хопнгӑлданӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Nom: хопнгӑлдалд
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Lat: хопнгӑлдалда
     хоп+N+Du+PxSg3+Loc: хопнгӑлдалдӑн

#
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Nom: хопнгӑлдӑмӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Lat: хопнгӑлдӑмӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu1+Loc: хопнгӑлдӑмӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Nom: хопнгӑлдӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Lat: хопнгӑлдӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu2+Loc: хопнгӑлдӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Nom: хопнгӑлдалд
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Lat: хопнгӑлдалда
     хоп+N+Du+PxDu3+Loc: хопнгӑлдалдӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Nom: хопнгӑлдув
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Lat: хопнгӑлдува
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl1+Loc: хопнгӑлдувӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Nom: хопнгӑлдӑн
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Lat: хопнгӑлдӑна
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl2+Loc: хопнгӑлдӑнӑн
#
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Nom: хопнгӑлдалд
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Lat: хопнгӑлдалда
     хоп+N+Du+PxPl3+Loc: хопнгӑлдалдӑн
#
     хоп+N+Pl+Nom: хопӑт
     хоп+N+Pl+Lat: хопӑта
     хоп+N+Pl+Loc: хопӑтӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: хоплдам
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: хоплдама
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg1+Loc: хоплдамӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: хоплдан
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: хоплдана
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg2+Loc: хоплданӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: хоплдалд
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: хоплдалда
     хоп+N+Pl+PxSg3+Loc: хоплдалдӑн


     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Nom: хоплдӑмӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Lat: хоплдӑмӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu1+Loc: хоплдӑмӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Nom: хоплдӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Lat: хоплдӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu2+Loc: хоплдӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Nom: хоплдалд
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Lat: хоплдалда
     хоп+N+Pl+PxDu3+Loc: хоплдалдӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: хоплдув
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: хоплдува
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl1+Loc: хоплдувӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: хоплдӑн
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: хоплдӑна
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl2+Loc: хоплдӑнӑн

     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: хоплдалд
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: хоплдалда
     хоп+N+Pl+PxPl3+Loc: хоплдалдӑн
